Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 14 Birds

20-14-1.
Birds protected.

No person shall pursue, hunt with intent to kill, take, destroy, or have in his or her possession any wild bird or birds at any season of the year unless harvested or taken in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the director. Possession of any bird during the time when the taking of birds is prohibited shall be evidence that the bird was taken in violation of this section, and each bird possessed in violation of this section shall constitute a separate and distinct offense.

This section shall not be construed to apply to any species of birds for which: (1) A federal depredation permit/order or a control permit/order has been issued in accordance with applicable federal law; or (2) A state depredation permit has been issued in accordance with §

20-14-1.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 327, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 197, § 1.

20-14-1.1.
Bird depredation and control permits and orders.

A person may petition and be issued a depredation permit/order or control permit/order from the director, or his or her designee, in accordance with applicable federal law, for the taking of birds when found committing depredations upon agricultural crops, livestock, or wildlife, or when concentrated in such numbers and manner as to constitute a health or public safety hazard or other nuisance.

Before any state depredation permits/orders or control permits/orders are issued, the director shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with applicable federal law, establishing standards governing the issuance of the permits/orders and other measures necessary for the control of birds causing depredation or constituting a health or public safety hazard or other nuisance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2002, ch. 327, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 162, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 197, § 1.

20-14-2.
Destruction of nest or eggs.

No person shall willfully disturb or destroy the nest or eggs of any wild bird, except pursuant to a program authorized by the director or for which a federal or state depredation permit has been issued.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 2002, ch. 327, § 1.

20-14-3.
Species not protected.

Sections

20-14-1

and

20-14-2

shall not be construed to apply to the killing or destruction of nests or eggs of English or European house sparrows
(Passer domesticus),
or European starlings

(Sternus vulgaris).

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-14-4.
Open season on migratory game birds.

The open season for hunting and the bag limits for migratory game birds shall be no less restrictive than the open season and bag limit fixed for those birds by the regulations of the United States Department of the Interior, Fish and Wildlife Service, made under the provisions of an act of Congress relating to migratory birds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-14-5.
Bag limits on game birds.

During the open season for the hunting of game birds, as declared by the director in regulations adopted pursuant to §

20-1-12

, a duly licensed person may take in any one day no more game birds than the bag limit established for game birds in the regulations. Possession of game birds in the field in excess of the numbers allowed in the bag limit established for game birds shall be evidence of the taking or killing of them; a person violating the provisions of this section shall be fined no more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each bird in excess of the bag limit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-14-6.
Export of birds.

No person shall carry or send beyond the limits of this state more than a two-day (2) bag limit of game birds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-14-7.
Prohibited methods of taking.

No person shall hunt, pursue, take, or attempt to take, upland or migratory game birds over any area that has been baited. For the purposes of this section a “baited area” is that on which salt, corn, wheat, or other grains have been scattered to lure, attract, or entice those birds to, on, or over, where hunters are attempting to take them and shall not be construed to include areas where corn, wheat, or other grains are scattered as the result of normal agricultural operations.

No person shall hunt, pursue, take, or attempt to take migratory game birds by the use or aid of live birds as decoys.

No person shall hunt, pursue, take, or attempt to take wild birds by the use of an electronically amplified recording of bird calls or sounds. However, this provision does not apply to crows.

No person shall take, kill, or destroy any wild bird by means of any trap, snare, net, spring, crossbow, rifle, pistol, fishhook, poison, drug, explosive, or stupefying substance, nor shall any person construct, set, maintain, or repair any of these devices for the purpose of taking, killing, or destroying wild birds.

No person shall shoot, or attempt to shoot, migratory game birds by means other than a shotgun of size ten (10) gauge or smaller, capable of holding three (3) or fewer shells, or a long bow (straight limb, reflex, recurve, and compound bow) and arrow.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1987, ch. 612, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 18.

20-14-8.
Watchaug Pond and Powaget Brooks.

No person shall take, kill, destroy, or pursue or in any manner molest any wild bird in any season of the year in that part of the town of Charlestown known as Watchaug Pond and Powaget Brooks or within one hundred (100) yards of the shore or banks of the Watchaug Pond and Powaget Brooks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-14-8.1.
Brushneck Cove and Buttonwoods Cove.

No person shall take, kill, destroy, or pursue or in any manner molest any wild bird in any season of the year in that part of the city of Warwick known as Brushneck Cove and Buttonwoods Cove or within one hundred (100) yards of the shore or banks of the Brushneck Cove and Buttonwoods Cove.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 264, § 1.

20-14-9.
Boats used in hunting waterfowl.

Migratory game birds may not be taken from, or by means of, any motorboat or a boat or other craft having a motor attached, unless the motor has been completely shut off and/or the sail furled, and its progress from the use of the motor or sail has ceased, or the boat or craft is used solely as a means of picking up dead or injured birds, nor shall migratory game birds be taken by means of aid of any motor driven land, water, or air conveyance used for the purpose of, or resulting in, the concentrating, driving, rallying, or stirring up of waterfowl; provided, however, that the shooting of crippled waterfowl from a motorboat under power will be permitted under the following conditions: crippled waterfowl may be pursued, shot, and retrieved from a boat under power seaward of the first upstream bridge in all coastal waters except coastal ponds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.